Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
ISSUANCE OF SHARES

7-106-201. Subscription for shares.

A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation is irrevocable for six months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation before the time the corporation is incorporated and accepts the subscription.

The acceptance by the corporation of a subscription entered into before incorporation and the authorization of the issuance of shares pursuant thereto are subject to section 7-106-202.

The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement states them. A call for payment by the board of directors shall be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement states otherwise.

Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration stated in the subscription agreement.

If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or other property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as it might collect any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty days after the corporation sends written demand for payment to the subscriber.

A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation is a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to section 7-106-202.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 755, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 2316, § 229, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-202. Issuance of shares.

The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

Subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (5) of this section, the board of directors may authorize the issuance of shares for consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, and other securities of the corporation.

Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors shall determine that the consideration received or to be received for the shares to be issued is adequate. In the absence of fraud in the transaction, that determination by the board of directors is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of such consideration relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid, and nonassessable.

When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of directors has authorized the issuance of shares, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable.

The promissory note of a subscriber or an affiliate of the subscriber for shares shall not constitute consideration for the shares unless the note is negotiable and is secured by collateral, other than the shares, having a fair market value at least equal to the principal amount of the note. For the purposes of this subsection (5), "promissory note" means a negotiable instrument on which there is an obligation to pay independent of collateral and does not include a nonrecourse note.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, shares having a par value may be issued for less than the par value.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 756, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-203. Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of shares issued by the corporation is not liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued under section 7-106-202 or stated in a subscription agreement under section 7-106-201.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder or a subscriber for shares of a corporation is not personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation; except that such person may become personally liable by reason of the person's own acts or conduct.

Any person becoming an assignee or transferee of shares or of a subscription for shares in good faith and without knowledge or notice that the full consideration therefor has not been paid shall not be personally liable to the corporation or its creditors for any unpaid portion of such consideration.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 757, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2317, § 230, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-204. Share dividends.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, shares may be issued pro rata and without consideration to the shareholders or to the shareholders of one or more classes or series of its shares. An issuance of shares pursuant to this subsection (1) is a share dividend.

Shares of one class or series may not be issued as a share dividend in respect of shares of another class or series unless:

The articles of incorporation so authorize;

Such issuance is approved by a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class or series to be issued; or

There are no outstanding shares of the class or series to be issued.

The bylaws or, in the absence of an applicable bylaw, the board of directors may fix a future date as the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend. If no future record date is so fixed, the record date is the date the board of directors authorizes the share dividend.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 757, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-205. Share options and other rights - definitions.

For purposes of this section:

"Rights" means rights, options, warrants, or convertible securities entitling the holders thereof to purchase, receive, or acquire shares or fractions of shares of the corporation or assets or debts or other obligations of the corporation.

"Significant shareholder" means any person owning, or offering to acquire, directly or indirectly, a number or percentage, as stated by the board of directors, of the outstanding voting shares of a corporation, or any transferee of such person.

A corporation may create and issue rights, except as precluded or limited by provisions contained in the articles of incorporation at the time of such creation or issuance. The board of directors shall determine the terms upon which the rights are issued, their form and content, and the consideration, if any, for which shares or fractions of shares, assets, or debts or other obligations of the corporation are to be issued pursuant to the rights. In the absence of fraud in the transaction, the judgment of the board of directors as to the adequacy of consideration received for such rights shall be conclusive.

Notwithstanding any other provision of articles 101 to 117 of this title, the terms determined by the board of directors pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for rights issued before, on, or after January 1, 1994, to any shareholders, by way of distribution or otherwise, may, without limitation:

Preclude or limit any significant shareholder from exercising, converting, transferring, or receiving rights;

Impose conditions upon the exercise, conversion, transfer, or receipt of rights by any significant shareholder that differ from those imposed on other holders of the same class of rights; or

Provide that, upon exercise or conversion, any significant shareholder shall be entitled to receive securities, obligations, or assets, the terms or nature of which may differ from the securities, obligations, or assets to be received by the other holders of the same class of rights.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to effect a change in the fiduciary duties of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 757, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(1)(b) amended, p. 2317, § 231, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-206. Form and content of certificates.

Shares may, but need not, be represented by certificates. Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title or another statute expressly provide otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are not affected by the fact that their shares are not represented by certificates.

Each share certificate shall state on its face:

The domestic entity name of the issuing corporation and that the corporation is incorporated under the law of this state;

The name of the person to whom the certificate is issued; and

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

Each share certificate:

Shall be signed, either manually or in facsimile, by one or more officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors;

May bear the corporate seal or its facsimile; and

May contain such other information as the corporation deems necessary or appropriate.

If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the share certificate shall contain a summary, on the front or the back, of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights applicable to each class, the variations in preferences, limitations, and rights determined for each series, and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future classes or series. Alternatively, each certificate may state conspicuously on its front or back that the corporation will furnish to the shareholder this information on request in writing and without charge.

If the person who signed, either manually or in facsimile, a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 758, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2317, § 232, effective July 1, 2004.

7-106-207. Shares without certificates.

Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, the board of directors may authorize the issuance by the corporation of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send to the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by subsections (2) and (4) of section 7-106-206 and section 7-106-208.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 759, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-208. Restriction on transfer of shares and other securities.

The articles of incorporation, the bylaws, an agreement among shareholders, or an agreement among shareholders and the corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of the corporation. A restriction does not affect shares issued before the restriction became effective unless the holder of such shares acquired such shares with knowledge of the restriction, is a party to the agreement containing the restriction, or voted in favor of the restriction or otherwise consented to the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is valid and enforceable against the holder or a transferee of the holder if the restriction is authorized by this section and its existence is noted conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate or is contained in the information statement required by section 7-106-207 (2). Unless so noted, a restriction is not enforceable against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is authorized:

To maintain the corporation's status when it is dependent on the number or identity of its shareholders;

To preserve entitlements, benefits, or exemptions under federal, state, or local laws; and

For any other reasonable purpose.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may:

Obligate the shareholder first to offer to the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

Obligate the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, to acquire the restricted shares;

Require, as a condition to such a transfer or registration, that any one or more persons, including the corporation or the holders of any of its shares, approve the transfer or registration, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable; or

Prohibit the transfer or the registration of a transfer of the restricted shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not manifestly unreasonable.

For purposes of this section, "shares" includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 759, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-106-209. Expense of issue.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares, and of incorporating, organizing, or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.